Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 7

Tennessee Local Development Authority Mental Health and Mental Retardation Facilities Act of 1990

4-31-701. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Local Development Authority Mental Health and Mental Retardation Facilities Act of 1990.”

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1.

4-31-702. Legislative intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that the provision of care, rehabilitation and treatment for mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, or alcohol or drug abuse or dependency is a public purpose.

The general assembly further finds and declares that, to the extent that financing the construction of facilities used in connection with the provision of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and alcohol and drug programs and services can be accomplished less expensively through the pooling together of needs and the use of less costly borrowing techniques, providers of such programs and services would be better able to construct these facilities and to provide essential programs and services for the benefit of the citizens of the state.

It is accordingly in furtherance of the interests and welfare of all Tennesseans that the Tennessee local development authority be empowered to issue its revenue bonds and to make the proceeds available for loans to mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and alcohol and drug facilities for capital projects, at interest rates lower than would otherwise be obtainable from private industry.

It is intended that the Tennessee local development authority be vested with all powers necessary to accomplish these purposes.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1; 2011, ch. 158, § 3.

4-31-703. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services when referenced in provisions relating to mental health facilities or centers and means the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities when referenced in provisions relating to intellectual and developmental disabilities facilities or centers;

“Construction” means construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, equipping, furnishing, bettering or extension of a facility, including paying engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection therewith;

“Department” means the department of mental health and substance abuse services when referenced in provisions relating to mental health facilities or centers and means the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities when referenced in provisions relating to developmental disabilities facilities or centers;

“Facility” means “facility” as defined in § 33-2-402;

“Grantee” means a nonprofit, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) corporation that is licensed under §§ 33-2-402 — 33-2-415 and §§ 68-11-201 — 68-11-250, that is under a grant contract with the department, and that has the primary purpose of delivering mental health, developmental disabilities or alcohol and drug services; and

“Project” means the facility or portion of a facility, the construction of which is being financed or refinanced by a loan pursuant to this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, § 29; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 6, 8M; 2009, ch. 186, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 15, 16; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-31-704. Issuance and sale of bonds and notes — Loans — Authorization.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, the authority has the power and is authorized to issue and sell bonds and notes, the proceeds of which may be used to make loans to any grantee for the construction or the refinancing of the construction of a facility pursuant to a loan agreement between the grantee, the department and the authority.

Such loans shall be made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority for the purpose of making such loans.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1.

4-31-705. Repayment of loans.

The authority shall establish a repayment schedule to be made by a grantee under a loan agreement.

Such repayments shall be in such amounts as will be at least sufficient, together with other funds available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, authority bonds and notes issued for the purpose of providing loans pursuant to this part and as may be necessary for the authority to maintain a reserve for debt service and to pay costs of administration.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1.

4-31-706. Issuance of bonds or notes — Limitations — Deficiency.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this part shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to any other provision of this chapter or law.

The authority shall not issue bonds and notes under this part in an aggregate principal amount at any one (1) time outstanding exceeding fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), excluding bonds or notes for the payment of redemption of which there has been or will be set aside and held in trust either moneys or direct and general obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States, or obligations secured by such obligations, or any combination thereof, that are or will be sufficient to pay when due the principal or applicable redemption price and all accrued interest thereon and, if such bonds or notes are to be redeemed, for which notice of redemption has been given or satisfactory provision has been made for the giving of such notice.

Each issue of its notes or bonds issued pursuant to this part shall be limited special obligations of the authority payable solely from, and secured by amounts derived by, the authority from loans made pursuant to this part.

At the end of each calendar year, the authority shall certify to the governor and the commissioner the amount of deficiency, if any, in the debt service reserve account for bonds and notes issued pursuant to this part to mental health or developmental disabilities facilities.

The commissioner shall transfer to the authority the amount of the deficiency from state funds appropriated to the department by the general assembly.

At the end of each calendar year the authority shall certify to the governor and the commissioner the amount of the deficiency, if any, in the debt service reserve account for bonds and notes issued pursuant to this part to alcohol and drug treatment facilities.

The commissioner shall transfer to the authority the amount of the deficiency from state funds appropriated to the department by the general assembly.

The authorization to issue additional bonds pursuant to this section is terminated. The authority and the department are authorized and directed to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state funding board providing for the monitoring and servicing of all outstanding loan agreements entered into under this part. Upon the issuance of debt by the state funding board, refunding and defeasing all outstanding authority debt previously issued pursuant to this part, the authority may transfer all payments received from grantees, as directed by the state funding board.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, § 30; 1998, ch. 846, § 1; 2009, ch. 186, § 2; 2010, ch. 1100, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Transfer of funds in event of deficiency in bond reserve account, OAG 91-95, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (11/27/91).

4-31-707. Administration of loans — Loan agreement — Security.

The authority shall administer loans made under this part.

In so doing, the authority may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the effective administration of this part.

The loan agreements into which the authority enters with grantees may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the grantees and shall include an agreement by the grantee to:

Proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project in accordance with the loan agreement;

Pledge any available sources of revenues, income and charges and make payments according to the repayment schedule;

Authorize the commissioner of finance and administration, in the event of a failure by the grantee to make a timely payment of amounts due under a loan agreement, to withhold grant funds pursuant to this part;

Establish and maintain adequate financial records for the project, including maintaining an inventory;

Cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards; and

Furnish a copy of such audits to the comptroller of the treasury;

Prepare and submit a plan of operation as required by this part;

Operate the project in accordance with law;

Reapply for or renegotiate its grant with the department for so long as the loan with the authority is outstanding; and

Not contract with any other entity, nonprofit corporation, corporation for profit, private person or firm for the operation of the facility without prior written permission of both the department and the authority.

The authority has the right to enter into further agreements with a grantee and require such further guarantees or securities as it may see fit prior to, or simultaneously with, the issuance of bonds or to refuse to issue bonds until such agreements or securities, in any form that the authority may elect, are agreed to or are obtained.

The loan agreement is subject to the approval by the attorney general and reporter as to form; each loan agreement is subject to approval by the commissioner of finance and administration as to funding. All pay requests shall be on vouchers approved by the authority, and payments to grantees shall be subject to audit at any time.

The authority shall require any type of security that it deems reasonable and necessary, including, but not limited to, a lien (deed of trust or mortgage) on the project; the authority shall be exempt from payment of indebtedness tax that would otherwise be due in connection with the perfection of the authority's lien.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1; 1995, ch. 30, § 2.

4-31-708. Notice of failure to remit funds — Withholding of funds.

In the event any grantee having entered into a loan agreement shall fail to remit funds in accordance with the annual repayment schedule established by the authority, the commissioner of finance and administration shall deliver by certified mail or other means of verified delivery written notice of such failure to the grantee within five (5) business days of such failure.

In the event the grantee shall fail to remit the amount set forth in the notice within ten (10) business days of the receipt of the notice, the commissioner shall, without further authorization, withhold such sum or part of such sum from any state grant funds that are otherwise available to such grantee for the benefit of the authority.

A grantee shall have no claims to grant funds withheld as permitted under the terms of this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1.

4-31-709. Enforcement.

The authority has the right, in addition to all other rights, by appropriate suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the grantee, its governing body, or any proper officer, agent or employee to carry out any agreements and to perform its and their duties under this part or under any rule or regulation of the authority adopted pursuant thereto.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1.

4-31-710. Certificate filed by commissioner.

Prior to the issuance of bonds or notes pursuant to this part, the commissioner shall file with the authority a certificate to the effect that:

The project to be financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes constitutes a facility in accordance with § 33-2-402;

Assisting the grantee in financing such project is in furtherance of the public purpose of the provision of mental health, intellectual disabilities, and alcohol and drug programs and services; and

The costs of the project are reasonable and the revenues of the grantee will be sufficient to cover the costs of operation and maintenance of the facility, including depreciation and debt service.

Such certificate by the commissioner shall be conclusive evidence that the projects to be financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes are facilities that may properly be financed from the proceeds of such bonds or notes; however, such certificate shall not constitute a guarantee of the success of the project or of the loan obligation of the grantee.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, § 31; 2000, ch. 947, § 8M; 2009, ch. 186, § 3; 2010, ch. 1100, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-31-711. Grantee's plan of operation.

At least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each state fiscal year, the grantee shall submit a plan of operation for review and approval to the commissioners of mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, health and finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury. The plan of operation shall be in such form as may be required by the department and shall include, but not be limited to:

A budget for operating and capital expenditures;

Contracts for services;

Appropriate policies and procedures adopted by the grantee to govern the expenditure of funds; and

Other items as required by the department through rules and regulations.

The plan of operation may be amended during a fiscal year with the written approval of the commissioners of mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, health and finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1990, ch. 975, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, § 32; 2010, ch. 1100, § 19; 2012, ch. 575, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.